src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON s82 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** fýlast
			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;
  	:%>s	sup			;
+V+Imp+Pl:%>ist #		;

LEXICON s83 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** samsinnast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
		  	pres_plast	;
			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;

LEXICON FYRIB !
!! **@LEXNAME@** kopi, s83
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
		  	pres_plast	;
			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;



!! ## Split lexica
! ============

! The lexicon names are, as always, from FO.
! Now, these are just mechanically split.
! They should be split more precisely,
! just like s2/1, in order to keep
! things minimal.

!LEXICON s1/26
!            s1    ;
!            s26   ;

!LEXICON s1/30
!            s1    ;
!            s30   ;

!LEXICON s11/15
!            s11   ;
!            s15   ;

!LEXICON s15/11
!            s15   ;
!            s11   ;

!LEXICON s18/16
!            s18   ;
!            s16   ;

!LEXICON s19/30
!            s19   ;
!            s30   ;

!LEXICON s2/1
!            s2    ;
!            prt_d ; ! this is the s1 part

!LEXICON s2/30
!            s2    ;
!            s30   ;

!LEXICON s21/11
!            s21   ;
!            s11   ;
!
!LEXICON s21/18
!            s21   ;
!            s18   ;
!
!LEXICON s24/2
!            s24   ;
!            s2    ;
!
!LEXICON s25/1
!            s25   ;
!            s1    ;
!
!LEXICON s27/30
!            s27   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s28/30
!            s28   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s29/2
!            s29   ;
!            s2    ;
!
!LEXICON s29/30
!            s29   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s3/30
!            s3    ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/1
!            s30   ;
!            s1    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/11
!            s30   ;
!            s11   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/19
!            s30   ;
!            s19   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/2
!            s30   ;
!            s2    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/22
!            s30   ;
!            s22   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/27
!            s30   ;
!            s27   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/28
!            s30   ;
! +Err/Orth: s28   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/29
!            s30   ;
!   +Use/NG: s29   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/40
!            s30   ;
!            s40   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/5
!            s30   ;
!            s5    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/6
!            s30   ;
!            s6    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/9
!            s30   ;
!            s9    ;
!
!LEXICON s36/2
!            s36   ;
!            s2    ;

!LEXICON s39/30
             !s30  ;
             !s39  ;

!LEXICON s47/19
!            s47   ;
!            s19   ;
!
!LEXICON s49/52
!            s49   ;
!            s52   ;
!
!LEXICON s49/9
!            s49   ;
!            s9    ;
!
!LEXICON s5/30
!            s5    ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s52/30
!            s52   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s6/30
!            s6    ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s60/30
!            s60   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s7/49
!            s7    ;
!            s49   ;
!
!LEXICON s74/75
!            s74   ;
!            s75   ;
!
!LEXICON s77/74
!            s77   ;
!            s74   ;
!
!LEXICON s8/30
!            s8    ;
!            s30   ;
!
LEXICON s8/48_2
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  s8    ;
  s48_2 ;
LEXICON s9/30
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  s9  ;
  s30 ;





!! ## Intermediate lexicon groups
! ===========================

LEXICON standard_ir
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  inf     ;
  prt_d   ;
  ir_verb ;

LEXICON standard_ir_t
!! **@LEXNAME@**
   inf                  ;
   prt_t                ; !XXX skilti
   ir_verb_t            ;

!LEXICON standard_j_ir_t
!  prt_t                ; !XXX skilti
!  standard_j_ir_nopret ;

! possibly also (no, handled by s1/2
!LEXICON standard_j_ir_td
!  prt_t                ;
!  prt_d                ;
!  standard_j_ir_nopret ;


!LEXICON standard_j_ir !
!!! __@LEXNAME@__ the prt_d
!  standard_j_ir_nopret ;
!  prt_d                ;

!LEXICON standard_j_ir_nopret
!!! __@LEXNAME@__
!    jinf       ;
!    pres_ir_sg ;
! :j pres_pl    ;
!    imp_prsptc ;
!    sup        ;

LEXICON ir_verb
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  pres_ir    ;
  imp_prsptc ;
  sup        ;

LEXICON ir_verb_t
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  pres_ir    ;
  imp_prsptc ;
  sup_t      ;

!! ## Suffix lexica
! =============

!! ### Infinitive
! __________

LEXICON jinf
!! **@LEXNAME@**
      +V+Inf:%>ja   # ;

LEXICON inf
!! **@LEXNAME@**
      +V+Inf:%>a   # ;

LEXICON reflinf
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Inf+Pass:%>ast # ;


!! ### Present
! _______

LEXICON pres_ir
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  pres_ir_sg ;
  pres_pl    ;

LEXICON pres_ir_j2
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ir # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ir # ;
 +V+Subj+Prs+3Sg:%>i  # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>ja # ;

LEXICON pres_jir
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>ji  Pass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>ji  rPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>ji  rPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>ja  Pass ;

LEXICON pres_ir_sg
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  Pass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>i  rPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>i  rPass ;
 +V+Subj+Prs+3Sg:%>i  Pass ;

LEXICON pres_ar
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  Pass    ; ! XXX sjekk
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%>a  rPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%>a  rPass    ;
                     pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_ur
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  Pass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     urPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     urPass    ;
                     pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_iur
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  Pass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     iurPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     urPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     iurPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     urPass    ;
                     pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_ur_j
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>ji Pass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     iurPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     urPass    ; ! XXX sjekk
               :j    pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_ur_j2
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i  Pass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     urPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     urPass    ;
               :j    pres_pl ;

!LEXICON pres_null
!!! __@LEXNAME@__
! +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%> #    ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:%> #    ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:%> #    ;
!                  pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_strong_s1
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:%>i Pass    ;
                    pres_pl ; !XXX

LEXICON pres_strong_s23
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     urPass     ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     urPass     ;
                     !pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_strong_s23_t
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     urPass_t     ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     urPass_t     ;
                     !pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_strong_s23_t0
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:    tPass     ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:    Pass     ;
                    !pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_strong_s23_t1
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     rPass     ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:     rtPass     ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:     rPass    ;
                     !pres_pl ;

LEXICON pres_pl
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:%>a Pass ;
 
 
 
 
 

LEXICON pres_ast ! Desse kunne ha gått til Pass.
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg+Pass:%>ast # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg+Pass:%>ast # ;

LEXICON pres_ist
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;

LEXICON pres_1ist
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;

LEXICON pres_23st
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg+Pass:%>st # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg+Pass:%>st # ;

LEXICON pres_plast
!! **@LEXNAME@**
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl+Pass:%>ast # ;
  
  
  

LEXICON pret_adist
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg+Pass:%>aðist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg+Pass:%>aðist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg+Pass:%>aðist # ;

LEXICON pret_dist
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg+Pass:%>dist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg+Pass:%>dist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg+Pass:%>dist # ;

LEXICON pret_tist
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg+Pass:%>tist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg+Pass:%>tist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg+Pass:%>tist # ;

LEXICON pret_ist
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg+Pass:%>ist # ;

LEXICON pret_st
!! **@LEXNAME@**
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg+Pass:%>st # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg+Pass:%>st # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg+Pass:%>st # ;
