src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
høggast:høgg FYRIB ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
munnhøggast:munn#høgg FYRIB ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
grovhøggast:grov#høgg FYRIB ;
bilgjast:bilgj FYRIB ;  !!≈ * @CODE@ 
forstilla:for#still s9/30 ;
renna:renn s8/48_2 ;
brenna:brenn s8/48_2 ;
hagvillast:hag#vill s83 ;
fyllast:fyll s83 ;
villast:vill s83 ;
sinnast:sinn s83 ;
borðfyllast:borð#fyll s83 ;
fýlast:fýl s82 ;
einast:ein s82 ;
viðkennast:við#kenn s83 ;
minnast:minn s83 ;
illminnast:ill#minn s83 ;
ørminnast:ør#minn s83 ;
misminnast:mis#minn s83 ;
samsinnast:sam#sinn s83 ;
fortapast:for#tap s82 ;
bakfettast:bak#fett s83 ;
tennast:tenn s83 ;
litbroytast:lit#broyt s82 ;
broytast:broyt s82 ;
meitast:meit s82 ;
orðgýtast:orð#gýt s82 ;
munnkýtast:munn#kýt s82 ;
kappkýtast:kapp#kýt s82 ;
orðkýtast:orð#kýt s82 ;
fjeppast:fjepp s83 ;
